Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Equipment of Railroads and Other Companies.

§ 59.1-125.
When unlawful to buy.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to barter, purchase, exchange, or buy from any person whomsoever, except plumbers, the owner of buildings from which the material is taken, railroad, coal mining, industrial, manufacturing and public
utility companies, or the authorized agents of such companies, lawful owners and junk dealers, licensed in this Commonwealth, any secondhand steel, copper, copper wire, aluminum, aluminum wire, brass, brass bearings or fittings, electric
light or gas fixtures, locks or other builders hardware, plumbing fixtures, bell or bell fixtures, lead or brass water pipes or any part of such fixtures or pipes, or any wire, cable, lead, solder, copper, iron or brass used by or
belonging to a railroad, telephone, telegraph, coal mining, industrial, manufacturing or public utility company; provided that this section shall not apply to any person, firm or corporation which shall barter, purchase, exchange,
buy or accept any secondhand grooved or figure-eight copper trolley wire, bare or insulated heavy stranded copper or aluminum feeder wire, high voltage copper or aluminum transmission wire, or bare or insulated mining machine copper
cables, but § 59.1-128 shall be applicable thereto.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-153; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439; 2011, c. 836.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 836 substituted “or buy from any person” for “buy or accept from any person” in the beginning.

§ 59.1-126.
Receipt or bill of sale to be taken by buyer; sales procedures.

Any person buying, at public or private sale, any such secondhand articles as are mentioned in § 59.1-125, except those excepted in said section, shall:

Take from the seller a properly dated written receipt or bill of sale signed by such seller which shall therein state specifically the seller’s address, business, social security number, vehicle license number, and place of residence. If a seller of such
articles be not personally known to the buyer or if the seller be unable to write his name, such seller shall produce an adult witness personally known to the buyer to identify the seller and also to sign such receipt or bill of
sale as witness, the latter also stating therein his full name, occupation and place of residence. Such receipt or bill of sale shall specifically set forth, by accurate description giving the character, kind, quality, weight,
length or size, and other detailed description sufficient to accurately identify the same, each of such articles so purchased and shall be retained by the buyer at his place of business for a period of six months after such purchase;
and

Make any payment for such articles purchased of $1,000 or more in the form of a check.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-154; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439; 2011, c. 80.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 80 subdivided the existing provisions of the section, creating the introductory language and adding the subdivision 1 designation; and added subdivision 2.

§ 59.1-127.
Violation of § 59.1-125 or § 59.1-126 a misdemeanor; revocation of dealer’s license.

Any person violating any of the provisions of § 59.1-125 or § 59.1-126 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-155; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439; 1972, c. 598; 1988, c. 765.

§ 59.1-128.
When unlawful to buy, exchange, etc., secondhand copper or aluminum wire.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to barter, purchase, exchange, buy or accept from any person whomsoever, except the manufacturer thereof or his authorized agent, railroad, coal mining, industrial, manufacturing and public utility
companies, or the authorized agents of such companies, governmental agencies, and licensed junk dealers, licensed scrap metal dealers, licensed electrical contractors and licensed merchants, any secondhand grooved or figure-eight copper
trolley wire, bare or insulated heavy stranded copper or aluminum feeder wire, high voltage copper or aluminum transmission wire, or bare or insulated mining machine copper cables.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-155.1; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-129.
Requirements when articles mentioned in § 59.1-128 are bought, exchanged, etc.

Any person, firm or corporation which shall barter, purchase, exchange, buy or accept any of the articles mentioned in § 59.1-128, shall comply with the provisions of § 59.1-126 and shall, in addition, tag each lot of said articles with the name of the
seller and the date of receipt and shall retain each such lot in his possession so tagged for 30 days in such manner that its separate identity shall be preserved; provided that the requirements of this section for tagging said
articles and retaining them in possession shall not be applicable if the receipt or bill of sale required by § 59.1-126 shall contain an authorization naming the agent who delivers the articles and signed by an officer, or by the
proprietor, of the manufacturer, or coal mining, industrial, manufacturing, public utility company, governmental agency, licensed junk dealer, licensed scrap metal dealer, licensed electrical contractor or licensed merchant, giving
such authorization.

Notwithstanding anything in subsection A to the contrary, the provisions of this article shall not apply to scrap metal processors as provided in Article 4 (§ 59.1-136.1 et seq.).

History.
Code 1950, § 59-155.2; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439; 2007, c. 917.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 917 designated the existing provisions as subsection A; substituted “30 days” for “thirty days” in subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 59.1-130.
Punishment for violation of § 59.1-128 or § 59.1-129.

Any person violating any of the provisions of § 59.1-128 or § 59.1-129 shall be confined in the penitentiary not less than one year nor more than two years, or in the discretion of the court or the jury trying the case, shall be fined not less than $100
nor more than $1,000, or confined in jail for any term not exceeding twelve months, or both. Possession of secondhand articles in violation of the provisions of the above sections shall be prima facie evidence of guilt.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-155.3; 1958, c. 614; 1968, c. 439; 1972, c. 598; 1988, c. 765.